Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 16.5
CARRIERS OF SLUDGE

40-16.5-101 to 40-16.5-109. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article repealed, p. 1211, § 28, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1994 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 1995. For the text of this article prior to 1995, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.